North Carolina, session 2025, HB202.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known as "The Defense Against Porch Pirates Act."
SECTION 2. Article 16 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 14-72.10. Larceny of mail.
(a) Definition. – For purposes of this section, the term "mail" means a letter, package,
bag, or other item of value sent or delivered to another.
(b) Offense. – A person is guilty of the offense of larceny of mail if the person does either
of the following:
(1) Unlawfully takes, or exercises unlawful control over, the mail of another
person with the intent to deprive the other person of that mail.
(2) Unlawfully transfers, or exercises unlawful control over, the mail of another
person or an interest in the mail of another person with the intent to benefit
the person or another person not entitled to that mail or interest in that mail.
(c) Punishment. – Unless covered under some other provision of law providing greater
punishment, a violation of this section is punishable as follows:
(1) A Class A1 misdemeanor if the offense is a first offense and the value of the
mail is less than two hundred dollars ($200.00).
(2) A Class G felony if the offense is a second offense and the value of the mail
is less than two hundred dollars ($200.00).
(3) A Class E felony if the offense is a first or second offense and the value of the
mail is two hundred dollars ($200.00) or more.
(4) A Class D felony if the offense is a third or subsequent offense or if the value
of the mail exceeds two thousand dollars ($2,000)."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
*H202-v-1*